Tennessee, session 114, HB2506.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 4, Chapter 42, is amended by adding
the following new section:
(a) Notwithstanding another law to the contrary, each state governmental entity
and official shall maintain the following information relative to the operational
HB2506
008686
- 1 -

enforcement of federal and state immigration laws as confidential, and such information
is not subject to public inspection:
(1) The name, contact information, address, and other personal
identifying information of each federal, state, or local officer, agent, or official
participating in federal immigration enforcement activities in this state; and
(2) Information related to specific future immigration enforcement
operational activities, such as the date and time, location, logistics, or strategies
of such activities.
(b) Subsection (a) does not:
(1) Apply to information that is public pursuant to federal law or a court
order; or
(2) Prohibit federal, state, and local law enforcement agencies and
officers from sharing information necessary to facilitate the enforcement of
federal and state immigration laws.
(c) Subsection (a) preempts any policy, procedure, or rule of a state
governmental entity or official in conflict with subsection (a).
(d)
(1) A state government official who, acting with criminal negligence,
releases information in violation of subsection (a) commits a Class E felony.
(2) A state government official who, acting with criminal negligence,
releases information in violation of subsection (a) is subject to ouster under title
8, chapter 47, if applicable.
(3) As used in this subsection (d), "criminal negligence" means the same
as defined in § 39-11-106.
- 2 - 008686

(e) This section does not preclude the enforcement of other applicable criminal
and civil penalties under federal or state law.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 7, Chapter 68, is amended by adding
the following new section:
(a) Notwithstanding another law to the contrary, each local governmental entity
and official shall maintain the following information relative to the operational
enforcement of federal and state immigration laws as confidential, and such information
is not subject to public inspection:
(1) The name, contact information, address, and other personal
identifying information of each federal, state, or local officer, agent, or official
participating in federal immigration enforcement activities in this state; and
(2) Information related to specific future immigration enforcement
operational activities, such as the date and time, location, logistics, or strategies
of such activities.
(b) Subsection (a) does not:
(1) Apply to information that is public pursuant to federal law or a court
order; or
(2) Prohibit federal, state, and local law enforcement agencies and
officers from sharing information necessary to facilitate the enforcement of
federal and state immigration laws.
(c) Subsection (a) preempts any policy, procedure, or rule of a local
governmental entity or official in conflict with subsection (a).
(d)
(1) A local government official who, acting with criminal negligence,
releases information in violation of subsection (a) commits a Class E felony.
- 3 - 008686

(2) A local government official who, acting with criminal negligence,
releases information in violation of subsection (a) is subject to ouster under title
8, chapter 47, if applicable.
(3) As used in this subsection (d), "criminal negligence" means the same
as defined in § 39-11-106.
(e) This section does not preclude the enforcement of other applicable criminal
and civil penalties under federal or state law.
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 7-68-102(3), is amended by deleting
the subdivision and substituting:
(3) "Official" means an agent, employee, member, or representative of a local
governmental entity and includes the mayor of a county, incorporated city or town, and
metropolitan government; and
SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 8-47-101, is amended by deleting the
language "or who shall commit any act constituting a violation of any penal statute involving
moral turpitude" and substituting instead:
or who shall commit any act constituting a violation of any penal statute involving moral
turpitude, or who shall, acting with criminal negligence, unlawfully release confidential
information relative to the operational enforcement of federal and state immigration laws
SECTION 5. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 10-7-504(f)(1), is amended by adding
the following new subdivision:
(I) The name of a law enforcement officer who is designated as working
undercover.
SECTION 6. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 10-7-504(f)(9), is amended by
deleting the subdivision.
- 4 - 008686

SECTION 7. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 10-7-504(f)(8), is amended by adding
the following new subdivision (f)(8)(C) and redesignating the current subdivision (f)(8)(C) as
subdivision (f)(8)(D):
(C) Any person required by law to treat information described in subdivision
(f)(1)(I) as confidential commits an offense if the person acts with criminal negligence, as
defined in § 39-11-106, in releasing the information to the public. A violation of this
subdivision (f)(8)(C) is a Class E felony.
SECTION 8. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 10-7-504(f)(8)(B)(i), is amended by
deleting the language "punishable only by a fine of five hundred dollars ($500)".
SECTION 9. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 10-7-504(f)(8)(D), is amended by
deleting the language "Subdivision (f)(8)(A)" and substituting "This subdivision (f)(8)".
SECTION 10. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 10-7-504(g), is amended by adding
the following new subdivision (g)(6):
(A) Any person required by law to treat information described in subdivision
(g)(1) as confidential commits an offense if:
(i) The person acts with criminal negligence, as defined in § 39-11-106,
in releasing the information to the public; or
(ii) The person knows the information is to be treated as confidential and
intentionally releases the information to the public.
(B)
(i) A violation of subdivision (g)(6)(A)(i) is a Class B misdemeanor.
(ii) A violation of subdivision (g)(6)(A)(ii) is a Class A misdemeanor.
(C) Any person required by law to treat information described in subdivision
(g)(1)(A)(iii) as confidential commits an offense if the person acts with criminal
- 5 - 008686

negligence, as defined in § 39-11-106, in releasing the information to the public. A
violation of this subdivision (g)(6)(C) is a Class E felony.
(D) This subdivision (g)(6) does not apply if:
(i) The law enforcement personnel whose information is treated as
confidential under subsection (g) expressly authorizes the release of such
information; or
(ii) The information is released pursuant to court order.
SECTION 11. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
- 6 - 008686